Utah statutes.
26-42-107.   Allocation of civil penalties.
Civil monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be allocated as
follows:
(1)  if a local health department conducts an adjudicative proceeding under
Section 26-42-104, the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in
which the violation was committed, and transferred to:
(a)  the local health department if it conducts a civil hearing under Section
26-42-104 alone; or
(b)  in equal portions to the local health department and the other agencies
that participated in the hearing process;
(2)  if the state Department of Health conducts a civil hearing under Section
26-42-104, the penalty shall be deposited in the state's General Fund, and may
be appropriated by the Legislature to the state Department of Health for use
in enforcement of this chapter; and
(3)  if the civil penalty involves suspension or revocation of a license to
sell tobacco under Section 59-14-203.5 or 59-14-301.5, half of the penalty
shall be paid to the commission, and the other half shall be allocated under
Subsection (1) or (2), as appropriate.
